cs: Typ tlumiče rakety: Tlačítkový; Nacvakávací; Kroužek; Housenka; Ostatní
ja: ラケットダンパータイプ: ボタン; クリップオン; リング; ワーム; その他
pl: Typ tłumika rakiety: Guzikowy; Zatrzaskowy; Pierścieniowy; Wężyk (worm); Inne
vi: Loại giảm chấn vợt: Nút; Kẹp; Vòng; Hình giun; Khác
pt-PT: Tipo de amortecedor de raquete: Botão; Clip; Argola; Minhoca; Outro
ko: 라켓 댐퍼 유형: 버튼; 클립형; 링; 웜형; 기타
zh-TW: 球拍避震器類型: 按鈕式; 夾扣式; 環型; 蟲型; 其他
zh-CN: 球拍减震器类型: 按钮形; 夹扣式; 环形; 长条形; 其他
it: Tipo di smorzatore per racchetta: Pulsante; A clip; Ad anello; A verme; Altro
lt-LT: Raketės vibracijos slopintuvo tipas: Sagutės tipo; Prisegamas; Žiedinis; Kirmėlės formos; Kita
el: Τύπος αντικραδασμικού συστήματος για ρακέτες: Κουμπί; Με κλιπ; Δακτύλιος; Τύπου σκουληκιού; Άλλο
tr: Raket titreşim önleyici tipi: Düğme; Klipsli; Halka; Solucan; Diğer
fr: Type d’amortisseur de raquette: Bouton; À clipser; Anneau; Ver; Autre
sl-SI: Vrsta blažilca vibracij za lopar: Gumb; S sponko; Obroč; Črv; Drugo
ru: Тип демпфера ракетки: Кнопка; На клипсе; Кольцо; Червячок; Другое
sk-SK: Typ tlmiča rakety: Tlačidlo; Pripínacie; Krúžok; Červík; Iné
en: Racket dampener type: Button; Clip-on; Ring; Worm; Other
nb: Racketdempertype: Knapp; Klips; Ring; Orm; Annet
hu: Ütőrezgés-csillapító típusa: Gomb; Felcsíptethető; Gyűrű; Hosszúkás; Egyéb
th: ประเภทตัวลดแรงสั่นสะเทือนของแร็กเก็ต: แบบปุ่ม; แบบคลิปหนีบ; แบบวงแหวน; แบบตัวหนอน; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Vrsta prigušivača reketa: Gumb; Kopča; Prsten; Crv; Ostalo
sv: Typ av racketdämpare: Knapp; Clip-on; Ring; Orm; Övrigt
nl: Racketdemper type: Knop; Clip-on; Ring; Worm; Overig
es: Tipo de amortiguador de vibración de la raqueta: Botón; Con clip; Anillo; Gusano; Otro
da: Ketsjerdæmpertype: Knap; Clip-on; Ring; Orm; Andet
de: Schlägerdämpfertyp: Knopf; Clip-on; Ring; Wurm; Sonstige
ro-RO: Tipul amortizorului rachetei: Buton; Prindere cu clips; Inel; Tip vierme; Altele
fi: Mailan tärinänvaimentimen tyyppi: Nappi; Kiinnitettävä; Rengas; Mato; Muu
bg-BG: Тип амортисьор за ракета: Бутон; С клипс; Пръстен; Червей; Друго
pt-BR: Amortecedor de raquete tipo: Botão; De encaixe; Anel; Minhoca; Outros